Hawaii statutes.
§480-12 Contracts void. Any
contract or agreement in violation of this chapter is void and is not
enforceable at law or in equity. [L 1961, c 190, §10; Supp, §205A-10; HRS
§480-12]

Case Notes

Construing the evidence in plaintiff decedent's trustee's
favor, there was sufficient evidence (decedent mortgagee's impairments, e.g.,
advanced age, inability to see or hear, and dementia, rendered decedent
"incapable of reading, writing and understanding re-finance mortgage
documents") that the mortgage between decedent and defendants was void
under this section, such that plaintiff may continue to seek rescission under
chapter 480. 848 F. Supp. 2d 1182 (2012).

Although a damage claim under §480-13 based on
violations of §480-2 may only be asserted against the wrongdoer, a rescission
claim under chapter 480 can stand against subsequent assignees if the contract
is void; where plaintiff had alleged that defendant mortgage broker assigned or
sold loans to other defendants, plaintiff could seek rescission against other
defendants if mortgage broker violated chapter 480 and the loans were void;
however, a plaintiff seeking affirmatively to void a mortgage transaction under
this section must "place the parties in as close a position as they held
prior to the transaction". 861 F. Supp. 2d 1153 (2012).

A partially illegal contract may be upheld by severing the
illegal portion. 61 H. 607, 607 P.2d 1304.

Where plaintiff did not provide to homeowners the lien
disclosure notices before or upon signing of the contract or prior to the
commencement of the work as required by §444-25.5(a), plaintiff's conduct was
an unfair or deceptive practice that rendered its contract void and
unenforceable at law or in equity under this section; thus, plaintiff was not
entitled to a lien upon homeowners' property under §507-42, and trial court did
not err in dismissing its lien application. 111 H. 349, 141 P.3d 996.

As this section voided the contract between homeowner and
contractor, §507-42 and this section precluded the imposition of a §507-42 lien
upon the homeowner's property by contractor who failed to comply with the
requirements of §444-25.5. 96 H. 365 (App.), 31 P.3d 222.

Section 444-25.5(d) and this section do not preclude some
recovery in quantum meruit from a homeowner by a contractor who fails to comply
with the requirements of §444-25.5; the amount cannot exceed the amount that
would have been due the general contractor under the contract had the contract
not been void, less the amount previously paid the contractor and the total of
the amount paid and owed to all sub-contractors and materialmen. 96 H. 365
(App.), 31 P.3d 222.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next